Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1324.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "certificate," "contractor" and "home improvement" in section 2 of the act of October 17, 2008 (P.L.1645, No.132), known as the Home Improvement Consumer Protection Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *123456789101112131415161718192021 "Certificate." A certificate of registration as a contractor, issued by the [Bureau of Consumer Protection] bureau, which contains a registration number assigned by the [Bureau of Consumer Protection] bureau."Contractor." Any person who owns and operates a home improvement business or who undertakes, offers to undertake or agrees to perform any home improvement. The term includes a subcontractor or independent contractor who has contracted with a home improvement retailer, regardless of the retailer's net worth, to provide home improvement services to the retailer's customers. The term does not include [any of the following:(1) A person for whom the total cash value of all of that person's home improvements is less than $5,000 during the previous taxable year.(2) A] a home improvement retailer having a net worth of more than $50,000,000 or an employee of that retailer that does not perform home improvements."Home improvement."(1) The term includes all of the following done in connection with land or a portion of the land adjacent to a private residence or a building or a portion of the building which is used or designed to be used as a private residence for which the total cash price of all work agreed upon between the contractor and owner is more than [$500] $1,000:(i) Repair, replacement, remodeling, demolition, removal, renovation, installation, alteration, conversion, modernization, improvement, rehabilitation or sandblasting.(ii) Construction, replacement, installation or improvement of driveways, swimming pools, pool houses, 20260SB1324PN1679 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 porches, garages, roofs, siding, insulation, solar energy systems, security systems, flooring, patios, fences, gazebos, sheds, cabanas, landscaping of a type that is not excluded under paragraph (2)(vi), tree care service of a type that is not excluded under paragraph (2)(vi), painting, doors and windows and waterproofing.(iii) Without regard to affixation, the installation of central heating, air conditioning, storm windows or awnings.(2) The term does not include:(i) The construction of a new home.(ii) The sale of goods or materials by a seller who neither arranges to nor performs, directly or indirectly, any work or labor in connection with the installation or application of the goods or materials.(iii) The sale of services furnished for commercial or business use or for resale, if the service takes place somewhere other than at a private residence.(iv) The sale of appliances, including stoves, refrigerators, freezers, room air conditioners and others which are designed for and are easily removable from the premises without material alteration.(v) Any work performed without compensation by the owner of the owner's private residence or residential rental property.(vi) Any work performed by a landscaper certified by the Department of Agriculture under the act of December 16, 1992 (P.L.1228, No.162), known as the Plant Pest Act, except to the extent that the work involves any of the following at a private residence:20260SB1324PN1679 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) The construction, replacement, installation or improvement of buildings, driveways, swimming pools, porches, garages, roofs, siding, insulation, solar energy systems, security systems, flooring, patios, nondecorative fences, doors, lighting systems, concrete walkways and windows.(B) The placement of retaining walls, fountains or drainage systems.(C) Tree care service.(vii) Emergency work pursuant to section 7 of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(viii) The conversion of existing commercial structures into residential or noncommercial structures.* * *"Letter of good standing." A certified document issued by another state or political subdivision stating that an out-of-State individual or entity is licensed or registered as a home improvement contractor in good standing and identifying any disciplinary action or audit and the outcome of the disciplinary action or audit.* * *Section 2. Section 3(a) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 3. Registration of contractors.(a) [General rule] Registration.--No person shall hold [himself] oneself out as a contractor, nor shall a person perform any home improvement without first registering with the bureau, as provided for in this act.* * *20260SB1324PN1679 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Nongrant or renewal of registration.--Prior to granting or renewing a registration, the bureau shall attempt to verify the statements of each individual making application regarding prior convictions by using the Pennsylvania Justice Network or a similar database to search the dockets of the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts for convictions of the applicant relating to a home improvement transaction, fraud, theft, a crime of deception or a crime involving fraudulent business practices. The bureau's verification process shall be conducted for each individual making application using the individual's name, date of birth and address submitted with the application. The bureau shall not grant or renew a registration to a person who, within the previous 10 years, has been convicted of a felony offense relating to a home improvement transaction, fraud, theft, a crime of deception or a crime involving fraudulent business practices.Section 3. Section 4(a)(1)(iv) and (vii) introductory paragraph and (A) and (b) of the act are amended and subsection (a)(1)(vii) is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 4. Procedures for registration as a contractor.(a) Application.--(1) A person shall apply to the bureau in writing or electronically via a secure Internet connection, if permitted by the bureau, on a form provided by the bureau. The application shall include the following information:* * *(iv) For an out-of-State corporation, limited liability or limited partnership, the name and address of the entity's resident agent or registered office provider within this Commonwealth and any registration number or 20260SB1324PN1679 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license number issued to the entity by its home state or political subdivision of such other state as specified in a letter of good standing, if applicable.* * *(vii) A statement whether:(A) The individual or individuals making application, any employee or immediate family member, even if doing so as part of a business entity application, [has] have ever been convicted of a criminal offense related to a home improvement transaction, fraud, theft, a crime of deception or a crime involving fraudulent business practices, as well as a statement whether the applicant has ever filed a petition in bankruptcy or, within the last ten years, received a final civil judgment entered against the applicant or [businesses] business in which the applicant held an interest that was related to a home improvement transaction.* * *(C) The individual or individuals making application, any employee or immediate family member, even if doing so as part of a business entity application, have ever been subject to an enforcement action by the bureau and the docket number of the action. For an action identified under this clause, the statement shall include the civil docket number, all relief ordered against or agreed to by the individual and whether monetary relief is owed.* * *(b) Reporting of multiple registrations or licensures.--Any 20260SB1324PN1679 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registered contractor in this Commonwealth who is registered or licensed as a home improvement contractor in any other state, or political subdivision thereof, shall report this information to the bureau on the initial registration and [biennial] annual registration application. Any disciplinary action taken in such other jurisdiction shall be reported to the bureau on the initial registration application or, if such action occurred subsequent to submission of an initial application, on the [biennial] annual registration application or within 90 days of final disposition, whichever is sooner. Information regarding multiple registrations or licenses reported on the initial registration application shall be included in a letter of good standing. Multiple registrations or licensures shall be noted by the bureau on the contractor's registration, and such state, or political subdivision thereof, shall be notified by the bureau of any disciplinary actions taken against such contractor in this Commonwealth.* * *Section 4. Sections 5(a), 7(g) and 8(a)(5) and (c)(5) of the act are amended to read:Section 5. Application fees.(a) Amount.--Each application for a certificate for a home improvement contractor or renewal of that certificate shall be accompanied by a fee [of $50] as set by section 1603-U of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, until December 31, 2029, or until determined by regulation. After completion of the application and payment of the fee, the bureau shall issue the home improvement contractor a registration certificate identifying the name of the individual contractor, name and address of the business and a 20260SB1324PN1679 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration number. Renewals shall be on [a biennial] an annual basis.* * *Section 7. Home improvement contracts.* * *(g) Contractor's recovery right.--[Nothing](1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), nothing in this section shall preclude a contractor who has complied with subsection (a) from the recovery of payment for work performed based on the reasonable value of services which were requested by the owner if a court determines that it would be inequitable to deny such recovery.(2) A contractor who has failed to include the notice of the right of rescission required under subsection (a)(13) or otherwise comply with section 7(b)(2) of the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law shall be precluded from the recovery of payment for work performed based on the reasonable value of services which were requested by the owner.Section 8. Home improvement fraud.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of home improvement fraud if, with intent to defraud or injure anyone or with knowledge that he is facilitating a fraud or injury to be perpetrated by anyone, the actor:* * *(5) misrepresents [himself] oneself or another as an employee or agent of the Federal, Commonwealth or municipal government, any other governmental unit or any public utility with the intent to cause a person to enter into any agreement for performing home improvement services or providing home 20260SB1324PN1679 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 improvement materials;* * *(c) Grading.--* * *(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, where a person commits a second or subsequent offense described in subsection (a), the offense will constitute a felony of the second degree regardless of the amount of money involved. For this paragraph to be applicable, the second or subsequent offense must have occurred after the first conviction. For purposes of this paragraph, a conviction shall occur upon the imposition of sentence. Paragraph (4) shall not be applicable to persons whose sentences would be enhanced pursuant to this paragraph.* * *Section 5. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the amendment of section 5(a) of the act.(2) Section 1603-U of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is repealed insofar as it is inconsistent with the amendment of section 5(a) of the act.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1324PN1679 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324